Foma_files/firstgrammar.foma
		# First analyzer/generator
		# def Noun {dog}|{cat}|{bus}|{fox}|{watch}|{fly}|{buzz};
		# def Suffixes ["[Pl]":{+s} | "[Sg]":0];
		# def Sibilant [c h | s h | z | s | x];
		# def SibilantRule "+" -> e || Sibilant _ Sibilant ;
		# def IERule y -> {ie} || _ "+" s ;
		# def Cleanup "+" -> 0 ;

		# def Lexicon  Noun Suffixes ;
		# def Grammar  Lexicon .o. SibilantRule .o. IERule .o. Cleanup ;
		# regex Grammar ;

# First analyzer/generator

# def Noun {dog}|{cat}|{bus}|{fox}|{watch}|{fly}|{buzz};
# def Suffixes ["[Pl]":{+s} | "[Sg]":0];

read lexc firstgrammar.lexc
def Lexicon

def Sibilant [c h | s h | z | s | x];
def SibilantRule "+" -> e || Sibilant _ Sibilant ;
def IERule y -> {ie} || _ "+" s ;
def Cleanup "+" -> 0 ;


def Grammar  Lexicon .o. SibilantRule .o. IERule .o. Cleanup ;
regex Grammar ;
